District of Columbia statutes.
29-704.03

Limited partnership liable for general partner’s actionable conduct.

(a)

A limited partnership shall be liable for loss or injury caused to a person, or for a penalty incurred, as a result of a wrongful act or omission, or other actionable conduct, of a general partner acting in the ordinary course of activities or affairs of the limited partnership or with authority of the limited partnership.

(b)

If, in the course of the limited partnership’s activities or affairs or while acting with authority of the limited partnership, a general partner receives or causes the limited partnership to receive money or property of a person not a partner, and the money or property is misapplied by a general partner, the limited partnership shall be liable for the loss.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(g)(4)(C), 59 DCR 13171

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 substituted “activities or affairs” for “activities” in (a) and (b).

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 403 of the Uniform Limited Partnership Act (2001 Act).

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.